Utah, session 2026, SB128.
Section 1. Section 53-10-1101 is enacted to read:11. Purple Alert System53-10-1101. Definitions.As used in this part:(1)"Amber Alert" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-10-1001.(2)"Dementia" means the same as that term is defined in Section 53-10-702.(3)"Purple Alert" means an alert issued under the Purple Alert Notification System by the department for a missing vulnerable individual in accordance with Section 53-10-1102.(4)"Purple Alert Notification System" means the system created in Section 53-10-1102.(5)(a)"Vulnerable adult" means an individual who:(i)is 18 years old or older but younger than 60 years old; and(ii)possesses a physical or mental impairment, permanent or temporary, that substantially affects the individual's ability to:(A)provide personal protection;(B)provide necessities such as food, shelter, clothing, or medical or other healthcare;(C)obtain services necessary for health, safety, or welfare;(D)carry out the activities of daily living; or(E)manage the individual's own resources.(b)"Vulnerable adult" does not include an individual who has dementia.(6)"Vulnerable minor" means a individual who:(a)is younger than 18 years old; and(b)has a permanent or temporary physical or mental impairment.(7)"Vulnerable individual" means a vulnerable adult or vulnerable minor.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 53-10-1102 is enacted to read:53-10-1102. Purple Alert Notification System -- Creation -- Law enforcement and department responsibilities.(1)There is created the Purple Alert Notification System for missing vulnerable individuals to be administered by the department to issue and coordinate alerts following the report of a missing vulnerable individual.(2)If a law enforcement agency receives a report of a missing individual, the law enforcement agency may request that the department activate a Purple Alert for the individual if the law enforcement agency determines that:(a)the missing individual is a vulnerable individual;(b)the Purple Alert is a viable means by which the missing vulnerable individual is likely to be returned to safety; and(c)there is sufficient descriptive information about the missing vulnerable individual and the circumstances surrounding the vulnerable individual's disappearance to indicate that activating the alert is likely to help locate the vulnerable individual.(3)The department shall activate a Purple Alert after receiving a request under Subsection (2) if:(a)in the case of a missing vulnerable individual who is a vulnerable minor, the criteria for the activation of the Amber Alert System under Section 53-10-1002 has not been met; and(b)the Purple Alert meets any additional requirements established by the department for activation of a Purple Alert under Section 53-10-1103.(4)(a)The Purple Alert Notification System shall:(i)except as provided in Subsections (4)(a)(ii) and (b)(i), utilize the same coordination as an Amber Alert; and(ii)when providing information to the Department of Transportation for the activation of highway signage to locate a missing vulnerable individual, indicate the specific geographical area in which the missing vulnerable individual was last seen, to ensure that signs only in that area will be activated.(b)The Purple Alert Notification System may not:(i)activate the Emergency Alert System when issuing a Purple Alert; or(ii)issue a Purple Alert that contains information regarding an endangered vulnerable individual's specific medical diagnosis.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 53-10-1103 is enacted to read:53-10-1103. Rulemaking authority.The department shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing policies, procedures, and a timeline for the:(1)request of a Purple Alert by a law enforcement officer or agency;(2)activation of a Purple Alert;(3)duration of a Purple Alert; and(4)cancellation of a Purple Alert.

Section 4:
Section 4.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on January 1, 2027.